New York, session 2025-2026, A290.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Sexual harassment training. 1. Duty. It shall be the duty of 4 the college authorities in general charge of the operation of any public 5 or independent college or university to cause any student participating 6 in a paid or unpaid internship or externship, whether on campus, or off 7 campus, to receive instruction and training in sexual harassment in the 8 workplace. 9 2. Report. On or before the first day of August next succeeding the 10 effective date of this section, the college authority in general charge 11 of the operation of a public or independent college shall annually 12 submit a report to the governor and the legislature which shall include, 13 but not be limited to, the number of students instructed pursuant to 14 subdivision one of this section. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01317-01-5